Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1105
Letter ruling, defined.

Letter ruling means a written
interpretation of law to a specific set of facts provided by the applicant
requesting a letter ruling.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 5.